Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 41

Go Build Tennessee Act [Effective until July 1, 2024]

4-41-101. Short title. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Go Build Tennessee Act.”

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-102. Chapter definitions. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the state board for licensing contractors, created by § 62-6-104; and

“Corporation” means a nonprofit corporation, which shall be properly incorporated under the laws of this state and approved by the United States internal revenue service as an organization that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(a)) by virtue of being an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)).

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-103. Creation of Go Build Tennessee Program — Administration by corporation — Composition of corporation. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

There is created the Go Build Tennessee Program, referred to in this chapter as “the program.”

The program shall be implemented and administered by a corporation, whose duties shall include, but not be limited to, securing funding to promote and foster the development of a comprehensive statewide program designed to attract and increase career opportunities for secondary and postsecondary students in the construction industry.

The corporation shall be comprised of an equal number of representatives of commercial and industrial building contractors and subcontractors, residential building contractors and subcontractors, and road building contractors and subcontractors.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-104. Authority to enter contractual and promotional agreements — Permitted expenditures. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

The corporation may enter into contractual and promotional agreements necessary to effectively stimulate the program for the purposes of educating persons regarding the construction industry and recruiting persons for careers in the industry. The corporation's expenditures may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Print, digital, and radio and television advertising;

Promotional materials;

Media campaigns;

Videos;

Brochures;

Website development and maintenance; and

Database development and maintenance.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-105. Go Build Account created. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

To fund the program, there is created within the state board for licensing contractors a Go Build Account, referred to in this chapter as “the account.” Amounts remaining in the account at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. Money in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the account.

A minimum of fifty percent (50%) of the total fiscal year fund balance resulting from contractor licensing revenue collected pursuant to title 62, chapter 6, part 1, after expenditures, shall be transferred by the board to the account, to be allocated to the corporation solely for the implementation, administration, and management of the program. This transfer shall occur on an annual basis in accordance with § 4-41-107.

The board, in consultation with the corporation, may promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, for disbursing the funds for the program, as necessary, pursuant to subsection (b).

There shall be participation and inclusion of the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the commissioner's designee in the board's administration and implementation of this chapter, including the provision of input from the commissioner or the commissioner's designee related to labor market information, safety and health, and the development of performance metrics consistent with industry growth indicators.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1; 2018, ch. 786, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-106. Duties and powers of corporation. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

The corporation shall implement the program to promote and encourage the recruitment of potential construction workers, and to encourage the development of training programs and create opportunities for new, skilled construction workers in this state.

The corporation may cooperate with state and local governments, private organizations, and citizens, as it plans and engages in activities related to the program. In addition to the funds received pursuant to § 4-41-105(b), the corporation may receive funds from individuals, businesses, governmental entities, foundation grants, and the state as appropriated by the general assembly.

All costs to underwrite the corporation's activities related to the program shall be paid from revenues of the corporation, and no state employee or any other person associated with the corporation shall benefit from the expenditures, either directly or indirectly.

The corporation may exercise all powers authorized pursuant to the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 51-68.

The corporation may request assistance from any agency of state government, subject to existing statutes, rules, and policies.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-107. Transfer of revenue from account to corporation. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

Beginning in the first full quarter of fiscal year 2015-2016 and in the first quarter of every subsequent fiscal year, the board shall transfer revenue from the account to the corporation to be allocated in the manner set forth in §4-41-105(b).

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1; 2018, ch. 786, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-108. Payment of expenses from moneys transferred from account to corporation. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

The corporation shall pay expenses incurred by the corporation for the administration of the program from moneys transferred from the account to the corporation pursuant to §4-41-105(b).

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-109. Reporting requirements. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

The corporation shall submit quarterly reports to include acceptable fiscal accounting practices and performance accountability metrics to the commissioner of labor and workforce development. The commissioner shall have oversight authority over the corporation's performance accountability and shall determine and establish required accountability metrics.

The corporation shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives that includes a statement of its operations. The report shall be submitted within ninety (90) days after the end of the corporation's fiscal year.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-41-110. Annual audit. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

An independent audit of the program shall be performed annually by a certified, independent public accountant who shall be paid from fees collected by the corporation. The independent audit shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-41-111.

4-41-111. Repealer. [Effective until July 1, 2024.]

This chapter is hereby repealed on July 1, 2024.

Acts 2015, ch. 500, § 1; 2018, ch. 786, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need to attract skilled construction workers, see Acts 2015, ch. 500.